Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 52. Explosives Handlers.

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Collateral references. —

Municipality liability for injury due to explosion of substance stored by third persons under municipal permit, 17 ALR2d 683.

Injury to child finding or having access to explosives, 21 ALR6th 81.

Sec. 08.52.010.
Power to adopt regulations.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development may issue orders and adopt regulations relating to the storage and use of explosives necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1(c) ch 120 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Sec. 08.52.020.
Certificate of fitness required.

In connection with an excavation, tunnel, quarry, earth removal, or construction carried on in this state, a person may not be employed without a certificate of fitness, while engaged in

emplacing explosives for detonation;

installing primers, fuses, wires, or other means of detonation; or

detonating explosives.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1968)

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Sec. 08.52.030.
Application for and issuance of certificate.

The department shall issue certificates of fitness. A certificate may be issued only to an individual. An applicant for a certificate shall apply in writing, under oath, on a form prescribed by the department containing

the name and address of the applicant;

the applicant’s age;

the applicant’s citizenship;

the applicant’s fingerprints and fees for a criminal background check conducted under AS

08.52.035

; and

other information that the department requires.

History.

(§ 1(a) ch 120 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Sec. 08.52.035.
Criminal justice information and records.

An applicant for the issuance or renewal of a certificate of fitness under this chapter shall submit to the department, with the application, the applicant’s fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check. The department shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

. The Department of Public Safety may submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The department shall use the information obtained under this section in its determination of an applicant’s qualification for issuance or renewal of a certificate of fitness.

In this section, “criminal justice information” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Sec. 08.52.040.
Issuance and contents of certificate.

If, upon investigation and examination by the department, the applicant is found competent by reason of training, experience, criminal history and background check, and physical fitness, the department shall issue a certificate of fitness. The certificate must set out the competency of the applicant and provide for positive identification of the applicant, and shall be carried on the person engaged in handling explosives.

The department shall establish in regulation standards of competency based on training, experience, criminal history and background checks, and physical fitness for the issuance of a certificate of fitness.

History.

(§ 1(a) ch 120 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1968; am §§ 3, 4 ch 105 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Sec. 08.52.050.
Fee.

An applicant for a certificate of fitness shall pay a fee at the time of application in the amount established by regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 1(a) ch 120 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 31 ch 37 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Sec. 08.52.060.
Duration of certificate.

A certificate of fitness is effective for three years from the date of issue.
The department may cancel a certificate for cause.

History.

(§ 1(a) ch 120 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1963)

Administrative Code. —

For explosives handlers, see 8 AAC 62.

Sec. 08.52.070.
Persons exempt.

Persons employed in mining operations as defined in AS

27.20.061

are exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1(b) ch 120 SLA 1955; am § 11 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Cross references. —

For training and certification of persons handling explosives in coal mining, see AS

27.21.940

.

Sec. 08.52.080.
Violations and penalties.

An employer who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted or order made under authority of this chapter is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.
Each day’s continuance of a violation constitutes a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1(d) ch 120 SLA 1955)

Sec. 08.52.100.
Definition.

In this chapter, “department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 18 ch 21 SLA 2000)